Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-622
Dangerous dogs;
violation; penalty.

Except
as provided in section 54-622.01, any owner who violates sections
54-617 to 54-621 shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1989, LB 208, § 6;

Laws 2009, LB494, § 10.